District of Columbia statutes.
21-2085

Proof of continuance of durable and other powers of attorney by affidavit.

As to acts undertaken in good faith reliance thereon, an affidavit executed by the attorney in fact under a power of attorney, durable or otherwise, stating that he or she did not have, at the time of exercise of the power, actual knowledge of the termination of the power by revocation or of the principal’s death or incapacity, is conclusive of the nonrevocation or nontermination of the power at that time. If the exercise of the power of attorney requires execution and delivery of any instrument that is recordable, the affidavit when authenticated for record is recordable in the same manner. This section does not affect any provision in a power of attorney for its termination by expiration of time or occurrence of an event other than express revocation or a change in the principal’s capacity.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
1981 Ed., § 21-2085.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act.